Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-228
Constitutional convention; elections; Election Act applicable.

All the provisions of the Election Act, including corrupt practices, shall apply to all of the elections provided for by sections 49-212 to 49-234 insofar as they are applicable, except there shall be but a single election board to supervise the elections and count the ballots.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 17, p. 552;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 565.

Election Act, see section 32-101.